Washington statutes.
RCW 19.162.010

Application of consumer protection act—Scope.

(1) The legislature finds that the deceptive use of pay-per-call information delivery services is a matter vitally affecting the public interest for the purpose of applying the consumer protection act, chapter 19.86 RCW.

(2) The deceptive use of pay-per-call information delivery services is not reasonable in relation to the development and preservation of business. A violation of this chapter is an unfair or deceptive act in trade or commerce for the purpose of applying the consumer protection act, chapter 19.86 RCW, and constitutes an act of deceptive pay-per-call information delivery service.

(3) This chapter applies to a communication made by a person in Washington or to a person in Washington.

[ 1991 c 191 s 1.]